Oklahoma, session 2026, SB721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 962, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 962. A. Every person legally entitled to compensation


for the removal or, storage, or remediation at the scene of an


accident of any vehicle subject to registration, which vehicle’s


removal has been authorized by any public agency, has a lien on the


vehicle, dependent on possession. The lien is deemed to arise on


the date of possession of the vehicle. Any person perfecting a lien


under this section shall foreclose this lien according to the


provisions for sale under Sections 908 through 911 of this title.





Req. No. 517 Page 1


B. Every owner of such vehicle towed or stored pursuant to


Section 955 of this title shall be responsible for the total amount


of the debt for services rendered.


C. Any wrecker or towing service is authorized to collect from


the owner, lienholder that seeks possession of a vehicle under a


security interest, agent, or insurer accepting liability for paying


the claim for a vehicle or purchasing the vehicle as a total loss


vehicle, the fee authorized by Section 904 of this title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-517 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:42:00 AM



























Req. No. 517 Page 2